District of Columbia statutes.
7-1131.18

Behavioral health resource guide.

(a)

By March 30, 2013, the Department shall:

(1)

Create a behavioral health resource guide for parents and legal guardians that includes information on:

(A)

Common signs and symptoms of behavioral health issues facing youth;

(B)

The roles and responsibilities of District government agencies in promoting and protecting the behavioral health of youth;

(C)

How a parent or legal guardian can obtain a behavioral health screening or assessment for a youth; and

(D)

Governmental and non-governmental resources for youth behavioral health programs and services in the District, including contact information; and

(2)

Create a behavioral health resource guide for a youth that includes:

(A)

Age-appropriate information on common behavioral health issues facing youth;

(B)

A description of the impact behavioral health issues can have on a youth’s development; and

(C)

Governmental and non-governmental resources for youth behavioral health programs and services in the District, including contact information.

(b)

The Department shall make the behavioral health resources guides available to the public both in print and on its website. The Department shall also make the guides available to other District agencies and organizations for distribution.

(c)

The Department shall update the behavioral health resource guides as appropriate.

Dec. 18, 2001, D.C. Law 14-56, § 115c
as added June 7, 2012, D.C. Law 19-141, § 402(b), 59 DCR 3083
This section is referenced in § 4-1303.03e.
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section 601 of D.C. Law 19-141, see § 7004 of Fiscal Year 2013 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2012 (D.C. Act 19-383, June 19, 2012, 59 DCR 7764).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section 601 of D.C. Law 19-141, see § 7004 of Fiscal Year 2013 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2012 (D.C. Act 19-413, July 25, 2012, 59 DCR 9290).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of D.C. Law 19-141, § 601, see § 4112 of the Fiscal Year 2014 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-130, July 30, 2013, 60 DCR 11384, 20 DCSTAT 1827).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of D.C. Law 19-141, § 601, see § 4112 of the Fiscal Year 2014 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-204, October 17, 2013, 60 DCR 15341, 20 DCSTAT 2311).
Section 4111 of D.C. Law 20-61 provided that Subtitle K of Title IV of the act may be cited as the “South Capitol Street Memorial Amendment Act of 2013”.

Section 601 of D.C. Law 19-141 provided: “Sec. 601. Applicability. This act shall apply upon the inclusion of its fiscal effect in an approved budget and financial plan.”

Section 601 of D.C. Law 19-141 originally provided that the act shall apply upon the inclusion of its fiscal effect in an approved budget and financial plan. Section 601 of D.C. Law 19-141, as amended by D.C. Law 19-168, § 7004, provided that the applicability of only §§ 302(b)(1), 304, and 502(a) are contingent upon the inclusion of their fiscal effect in an approved budget and financial plan.

Section 601 of D.C. Law 19-141, as amended by D.C. Law 20-61, § 4112, provided that §§ 302(b)(1)(A) and (C) and 304(b)(1)(D) of D.C. Law 19-141 shall apply to public charter schools upon the inclusion of their fiscal effect in an approved budget and financial plan, as certified by the Chief Financial Officer to the Budget Director of the Council in a certification published by the Council in the District of Columbia Register. Section 302(b)(1)(A) of D.C. Law 19-141 added § 38-203(i)(A-i); Section 302(b)(1)(C) of D.C. Law 19-141 added § 38-203(i)(B-i); and Section 304(b)(1)(D) of D.C. Law 19-141 added 5 DCMR § A2103(c)(6).